Hawaii statutes.
[§235-128] Returns; shareholder agreements;
mandatory payments. (a) An S corporation which engages in activities in
this State which would subject a C corporation to the requirement to file a
return under section 235-92 shall file with the department an annual return, in
the form prescribed by the department, on or before the due date prescribed for
the filing of C corporation returns by section 235-97.

Every S corporation shall make a return for
each taxable year, stating specifically the items of its gross income and the
deductions allowable by this chapter, the name, address, and social security or
federal identification number of each person owning stock in the corporation at
any time during the taxable year, the number of shares of stock owned by each
shareholder at all times during the taxable year, the income attributable to
the State and income not attributable to the State with respect to each
shareholder as determined under this part, the modifications required by
section 235-123, the amount of money and other property distributed by the
corporation during the taxable year to each shareholder, the date of each such
distribution, and such other information as the department may by form or rule
prescribe.

The S corporation, on or before the day on
which such return is filed, shall furnish to each person who was a shareholder
during the year a copy of the information shown on the return as the department
may by form or rule prescribe. Any return filed pursuant to this section, for
purposes of sections 235-111 and 235-112, shall be treated as a return filed by
the corporation under section 235-92. The S corporation shall also maintain
the accumulated adjustments account described in section 235-127(c)(2).

(b) The department shall permit S corporations
to file composite returns and to make composite payments of tax on behalf of
some or all of its nonresident shareholders. The department may permit
composite returns and payments to be made on behalf of resident shareholders.

(c) An S corporation shall file with the
department, in the form prescribed by the department, the agreement of each
nonresident shareholder of the corporation:

(1) To file a return and make timely payment of all
taxes imposed by this State on the shareholder with respect to the income of
the S corporation; and

(2) To be subject to personal jurisdiction in this
State for purposes of the collection of unpaid income tax, together with
related interest and penalties.

If the corporation fails to timely file the
agreements required by paragraphs (1) and (2) on behalf of each of its
nonresident shareholders, then the corporation, at the times set forth in
subsection (d), shall pay to this State on behalf of each nonresident
shareholder in respect of whom an agreement has not been timely filed an amount
equal to the highest marginal tax rate in effect under section 235-51
multiplied by the amount of the shareholder's pro rata share of the income
attributable to the State reflected on the corporation's return for the taxable
period. An S corporation shall be entitled to recover a payment made pursuant
to the preceding sentence from the shareholder on whose behalf the payment was
made.

(d) The agreements required to be filed
pursuant to subsection (c) shall be filed at the following times:

(1) At the time the annual return is required to be
filed for the first taxable period for which the S corporation became subject
to this part, and

(2) At the time the annual return is required to be
filed for any taxable period in which the corporation had a nonresident
shareholder on whose behalf such an agreement has not been previously filed.

(e) Any amount paid by the corporation to this
State pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) shall be considered to be a payment by
the shareholder on account of the income tax imposed on the shareholder for the
taxable period.

(f) Any officer of any S corporation who
wilfully fails to provide any information, file any return or agreement, make
any payment, or maintain any account as required by this section or by section
231-15.6 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1990, c 16, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next